District of Columbia statutes.
47-340

Notation of debt service requirement on real property tax bills.

Commencing with the tax year beginning October 1, 1994, and ending September 30, 1995, and for each tax year thereafter, the Mayor shall note on the first half tax bill, which is due and payable by March 31, 1995, and on the second half tax bill, which is due and payable by September 15, 1995, the percent of the total real property tax levy that constitutes the special real property tax levy.

History

May 24, 1994, D.C. Law 10-126, § 6, 41 DCR 1814
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-340.